Utah statutes.
75-7-511.   Classification of claims.
(1)  If the applicable assets of the deceased settlor's estate or trust estate
are insufficient to pay all claims in full, the trustee shall make payment in
the following order:
(a)  reasonable funeral expenses;
(b)  costs and expenses of administration;
(c)  debts and taxes with preference under federal law;
(d)  reasonable and necessary medical and hospital expenses of the last
illness of the deceased settlor, including compensation of persons attending
him, and medical assistance if Section 26-19-13.5 applies;
(e)  debts and taxes with preference under other laws of this state; and
(f)  all other claims.
(2)  No preference shall be given in the payment of any claim over any other
claim of the same class, and a claim due and payable shall not be entitled to
a preference over claims not due.
